italian.aff
# particelle pronominali su part. pass.
flag *V:

    # flag *V:
    # nuocere
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutolo
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutola
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutoli
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutole
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutone
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutalo
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutala
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutali
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutale
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutane
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutilo
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutila
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutili
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutile
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutine
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutelo
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutela
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociuteli
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutele
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutene
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutomi
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutoti
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutogli
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutoci
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutovi
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutosi
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutami
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutati
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutagli
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutaci
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutavi
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutasi
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutimi
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutiti
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutigli
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutici
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutivi
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutisi
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutemi
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociuteti
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutegli
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociuteci
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutevi
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutesi
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutovene
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutavene
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutivene
    n u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ociutevene

    # flag *V:
    # esigere, redigere, transigere
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attolo
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attola
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attoli
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attole
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attone
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attalo
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attala
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attali
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attale
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attane
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attilo
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attila
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attili
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attile
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attine
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attelo
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attela
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,atteli
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attele
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attene
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attomi
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attoti
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attogli
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attoci
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attovi
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attosi
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attami
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attati
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attagli
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attaci
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attavi
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attasi
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attimi
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attiti
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attigli
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attici
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attivi
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attisi
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attemi
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,atteti
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attegli
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,atteci
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attevi
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attesi
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attovene
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attavene
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attivene
    [ds] i g e r e  >    -igere,attevene

    # flag *V:
    # dirigere, erigere, ridirigere
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettolo
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettola
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettoli
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettole
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettone
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettalo
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettala
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettali
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettale
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettane
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettilo
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettila
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettili
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettile
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettine
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettelo
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettela
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,etteli
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettele
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettene
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettomi
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettoti
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettogli
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettoci
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettovi
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettosi
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettami
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettati
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettagli
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettaci
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettavi
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettasi
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettimi
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettiti
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettigli
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettici
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettivi
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettisi
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettemi
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,etteti
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettegli
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,etteci
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettevi
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettesi
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettovene
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettavene
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettivene
    r i g e r e     >    -igere,ettevene

    # flag *V:
    # nascere, prenascere, rinascere
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tolo
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tola
    s c e r e       >    -scere,toli
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tole
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tone
    s c e r e       >    -scere,talo
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tala
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tali
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tale
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tane
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tilo
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tila
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tili
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tile
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tine
    s c e r e       >    -scere,telo
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tela
    s c e r e       >    -scere,teli
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tele
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tene
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tomi
    s c e r e       >    -scere,toti
    s c e r e       >    -scere,togli
    s c e r e       >    -scere,toci
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tovi
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tosi
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tami
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tati
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tagli
    s c e r e       >    -scere,taci
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tavi
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tasi
    s c e r e       >    -scere,timi
    s c e r e       >    -scere,titi
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tigli
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tici
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tivi
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tisi
    s c e r e       >    -scere,temi
    s c e r e       >    -scere,teti
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tegli
    s c e r e       >    -scere,teci
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tevi
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tesi
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tovene
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tavene
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tivene
    s c e r e       >    -scere,tevene

    # flag *V:
    # cuocere, ricuocere, stracuocere
    c u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ottolo
    c u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ottola
    c u o c e r e   >    -uocere,ottoli
