italian.dict
abbrivare/ABCGKOSVY1
accantonare/ABCGKOSVY1
acchiocciolare/ABCGKOSVY1
accorrere/ABDGKOSVY1
addentare/ABCGKOSVY1
adunare/ABCGKOSVY1
affittare/ABCGKOSVY1
aggobbire/ABCGKOSVY1
albergare/ABCGKOSVY1
allitterare/ABCGKOSVY1
ammalizzire/ABCGKOSVY1
ammostare/ABCGKOSVY1
annichilare/ABCGKOSVY1
appaltare/ABCGKOSVY1
apporre/ABCGKOSVY1
ardire/ABCGKOSVY1
arrivare/ABCGKOSVY1
asineggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
assoldare/ABCGKOSVY1
attingere/ABDGKOSVY1
autocitare/ABCGKOSVY1
avvampare/ABCGKOSVY1
azzittare/ABCGKOSVY1
baraccare/ABCGKOSVY1
beccheggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
biondeggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
bolscevizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
brinare/ABCGKOSVY1
bussare/ABCGKOSVY1
campeggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
captare/ABCGKOSVY1
catramare/ABCGKOSVY1
chiamare/ABCGKOSVY1
ciurlare/ABCGKOSVY1
collezionare/ABCGKOSVY1
comperare/ABCGKOSVY1
concreare/ABCGKOSVY1
congetturare/ABCGKOSVY1
contemplare/ABCGKOSVY1
convenzionare/ABCGKOSVY1
costernare/ABCGKOSVY1
cucciare/ABCGKOSVY1
decentralizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
dedurre/ABCGKOSVY1
delegificare/ABCGKOSVY1
denunciare/ABCGKOSVY1
derogare/ABCGKOSVY1
devitalizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
diluviare/ABCGKOSVY1
disamorare/ABCGKOSVY1
disgelare/ABCGKOSVY1
disorganizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
distaccare/ABCGKOSVY1
donare/ABCGKOSVY1
effigiare/ABCGKOSVY1
enervare/ABCGKOSVY1
esasperare/ABCGKOSVY1
espirare/ABCGKOSVY1
eterizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
farfugliare/ABCGKOSVY1
ficcanasare/ABCGKOSVY1
fluire/ABCGKOSVY1
fotografare/ABCGKOSVY1
frisare/ABCGKOSVY1
galleggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
gessare/ABCGKOSVY1
giudaizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
graffiare/ABCGKOSVY1
guadare/ABCGKOSVY1
imbacuccare/ABCGKOSVY1
imboccare/ABCGKOSVY1
imbufalire/ABCGKOSVY1
impagliare/ABCGKOSVY1
impeciare/ABCGKOSVY1
impidocchire/ABCGKOSVY1
imprestare/ABCGKOSVY1
inasprire/ABCGKOSVY1
incapsulare/ABCGKOSVY1
incazzottare/ABCGKOSVY1
inclinare/ABCGKOSVY1
incubare/ABCGKOSVY1
indurire/ABCGKOSVY1
infievolire/ABCGKOSVY1
infoscare/ABCGKOSVY1
ingerire/ABCGKOSVY1
ingravidare/ABCGKOSVY1
inorridire/ABCGKOSVY1
insospettire/ABCGKOSVY1
intercalare/1ABCGKOSVYa
intimare/ABCGKOSVY1
intronare/ABCGKOSVY1
investigare/ABCGKOSVY1
iridare/ABCGKOSVY1
istruire/ABCGKOSVY1
lavoricchiare/ABCGKOSVY1
liquidare/ABCGKOSVY1
maculare/ABCGKOSVY1
marginare/ABCGKOSVY1
meditare/ABCGKOSVY1
miagolare/ABCGKOSVY1
mitizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
mordicchiare/ABCGKOSVY1
nascere/ABDGKOSVY1
normare/ABCGKOSVY1
omaggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
ormeggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
ovariectomizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
panoramicare/ABCGKOSVY1
passivare/ABCGKOSVY1
penare/ABCGKOSVY1
perseguitare/ABCGKOSVY1
pigmentare/ABCGKOSVY1
plasticare/ABCGKOSVY1
posdatare/ABCGKOSVY1
predicare/ABCGKOSVY1
presegnalare/ABCGKOSVY1
produrre/ABCGKOSVY1
proporzionare/ABCGKOSVY1
puntare/ABCGKOSVY1
rabbuiare/ABCGKOSVY1
radunare/ABCGKOSVY1
raggruzzolare/ABCGKOSVY1
rapare/ABCGKOSVY1
rattristare/ABCGKOSVY1
redarguire/ABCGKOSVY1
reinsediare/ABCGKOSVY1
resuscitare/ABCGKOSVY1
riadagiare/ABCGKOSVY1
riapplicare/ABCGKOSVY1
ribussare/ABCGKOSVY1
ricompattare/ABCGKOSVY1
ricusare/ABCGKOSVY1
riesplodere/ABCGKOSVY1
rigelare/ABCGKOSVY1
rimbacuccare/ABCGKOSVY1
rimpalmare/ABCGKOSVY1
rincitrullire/ABCGKOSVY1
ringagliardire/ABCGKOSVY1
rintonacare/ABCGKOSVY1
ripensare/ABCGKOSVY1
risanare/ABCGKOSVY1
rispiegare/ABCGKOSVY1
ritorcere/ABDGKOSVY1
rodare/ABCGKOSVY1
ruzzare/ABCGKOSVY1
sanare/ABCGKOSVY1
sbaragliare/ABCGKOSVY1
sbollire/ABCGKOSVY1
sbucare/ABCGKOSVY1
scalpicciare/ABCGKOSVY1
scarcerare/ABCGKOSVY1
scemare/ABCGKOSVY1
sciabicare/ABCGKOSVY1
scollegare/ABCGKOSVY1
scontentare/ABCGKOSVY1
screpolare/ABCGKOSVY1
sdrucciolare/ABCGKOSVY1
serigrafare/ABCGKOSVY1
sfeltrare/ABCGKOSVY1
sforacchiare/ABCGKOSVY1
sgobbare/ABCGKOSVY1
sgropponare/ABCGKOSVY1
sinistrare/ABCGKOSVY1
smaniare/ABCGKOSVY1
smurare/ABCGKOSVY1
soggiornare/ABCGKOSVY1
sonicchiare/ABCGKOSVY1
sorgere/ABDGKOSVY1
soverchiare/ABCGKOSVY1
spalancare/ABCGKOSVY1
spettegolare/ABCGKOSVY1
spossessare/ABCGKOSVY1
stallare/ABCGKOSVY1
stordire/ABCGKOSVY1
strombazzare/ABCGKOSVY1
surgelare/ABCGKOSVY1
svuotare/ABCGKOSVY1
temere/ABCGKOSVY1
tonificare/ABCGKOSVY1
transubstanziare/ABCGKOSVY1
trincerare/ABCGKOSVY1
unire/ABCGKOSVY1
verniciare/ABCGKOSVY1z
vulcanizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
